Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2071.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5841XS (1) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2071 Section 1. MEDICAL EXAMINER INVESTIGATION FORM FOR 1 CHILD DEATHS AGE ZERO TO THREE ââ INFORMATION REGARDING 2 IMMUNIZATIONS. 3 1. The report used by medical examiners for investigations 4 of infants zero to three years of age shall include a request 5 for information regarding the date and type of the decedentâs 6 last immunization. If the decedent received more than 7 one immunization at the time of the last immunization, the 8 information provided shall include all immunizations received. 9 2. The state medical examiner shall adopt rules pursuant to 10 chapter 17A to comply with this section. 11